dicts/it_IT/it_IT.aff
SFX H Y 42
SFX H o e ito
SFX H o i ito
SFX H o a ito
SFX H 0 lo ito
SFX H 0 la ito
SFX H 0 le ito
SFX H o issimo ito
SFX H o issima ito
SFX H o issime ito
SFX H o issimi ito
SFX H 0 mi ito
SFX H 0 ti ito
SFX H 0 si ito
SFX H 0 ci ito
SFX H 0 vi ito
SFX H 0 li ito
SFX H 0 ne ito
SFX H 0 gli ito
SFX H o emi ito
SFX H o esi ito
SFX H o eci ito
SFX H o evi ito
SFX H o egli ito
SFX H o ene ito
SFX H o elo ito
SFX H o ela ito
SFX H o ele ito
SFX H o eli ito
SFX H o ami ito
SFX H o ati ito
SFX H o asi ito
SFX H o aci ito
SFX H o avi ito
SFX H o agli ito
SFX H o ane ito
SFX H o ala ito
SFX H o ili ito
SFX H o ine ito
SFX H o evene ito
SFX H o avene ito
SFX H o ivene ito
SFX H 0 vene ito

SFX I Y 64
SFX I si mi arsi
SFX I si ti arsi
SFX I si ci arsi
SFX I si le arsi
SFX I si lo arsi
SFX I si li arsi
SFX I si vi arsi
SFX I si gli arsi
SFX I si ne arsi
SFX I si la arsi
SFX I si telo arsi
SFX I si tela arsi
SFX I si teli arsi
SFX I si tele arsi
SFX I si tene arsi
SFX I si melo arsi
SFX I si mela arsi
SFX I si meli arsi
SFX I si mele arsi
SFX I si mene arsi
SFX I i elo arsi
SFX I i ela arsi
SFX I i eli arsi
SFX I i ele arsi
SFX I i ene arsi
SFX I si celo arsi
SFX I si cela arsi
SFX I si celi arsi
SFX I si cele arsi
SFX I si cene arsi
SFX I si velo arsi
SFX I si vela arsi
SFX I si veli arsi
SFX I si vele arsi
SFX I si vene arsi
SFX I si glielo arsi
SFX I si gliela arsi
SFX I si glieli arsi
SFX I si gliele arsi
SFX I si gliene arsi
SFX I rsi mi arsi
SFX I rsi ti arsi
SFX I rsi ci arsi
SFX I rsi le arsi
SFX I rsi lo arsi
SFX I rsi li arsi
SFX I rsi gli arsi
SFX I rsi ne arsi
SFX I rsi la arsi
SFX I rsi melo arsi
SFX I rsi mela arsi
SFX I rsi meli arsi
SFX I rsi mele arsi
SFX I rsi mene arsi
SFX I rsi celo arsi
SFX I rsi cela arsi
SFX I rsi celi arsi
SFX I rsi cele arsi
SFX I rsi cene arsi
SFX I rsi glielo arsi
SFX I rsi gliela arsi
SFX I rsi glieli arsi
SFX I rsi gliele arsi
SFX I rsi gliene arsi

SFX L Y 69
SFX L si mi ersi
SFX L si ti ersi
SFX L si ci ersi
SFX L si le ersi
SFX L si lo ersi
SFX L si li ersi
SFX L si vi ersi
SFX L si gli ersi
SFX L si ne ersi
SFX L si la ersi
SFX L si telo ersi
SFX L si tela ersi
SFX L si teli ersi
SFX L si tele ersi
SFX L si tene ersi
SFX L si melo ersi
SFX L si mela ersi
SFX L si meli ersi
SFX L si mele ersi
SFX L si mene ersi
SFX L i elo ersi
SFX L i ela ersi
SFX L i eli ersi
SFX L i ele ersi
SFX L i ene ersi
SFX L si celo ersi
SFX L si cela ersi
SFX L si celi ersi
SFX L si cele ersi
SFX L si cene ersi
SFX L si velo ersi
SFX L si vela ersi
SFX L si veli ersi
SFX L si vele ersi
SFX L si vene ersi
SFX L si glielo ersi
SFX L si gliela ersi
SFX L si glieli ersi
SFX L si gliele ersi
SFX L si gliene ersi
SFX L ersi imi ersi
SFX L ersi iti ersi
SFX L ersi ici ersi
SFX L ersi ile ersi
SFX L ersi ilo ersi
SFX L ersi ili ersi
SFX L ersi igli ersi
SFX L ersi ine ersi
SFX L ersi ila ersi
SFX L ersi imelo ersi
SFX L ersi imela ersi
SFX L ersi imeli ersi
SFX L ersi imele ersi
SFX L ersi itelo ersi
SFX L ersi itela ersi
SFX L ersi iteli ersi
SFX L ersi itele ersi
SFX L ersi itene ersi
SFX L ersi imene ersi
SFX L ersi icelo ersi
SFX L ersi icela ersi
SFX L ersi iceli ersi
SFX L ersi icele ersi
SFX L ersi icene ersi
SFX L ersi iglielo ersi
SFX L ersi igliela ersi
SFX L ersi iglieli ersi
SFX L ersi igliele ersi
SFX L ersi igliene ersi

SFX M Y 69
SFX M si mi irsi
SFX M si ti irsi
SFX M si ci irsi
SFX M si le irsi
SFX M si lo irsi
SFX M si li irsi
SFX M si vi irsi
SFX M si gli irsi
SFX M si ne irsi
SFX M si la irsi
SFX M si telo irsi
SFX M si tela irsi
SFX M si teli irsi
SFX M si tele irsi
SFX M si tene irsi
SFX M si melo irsi
SFX M si mela irsi
SFX M si meli irsi
SFX M si mele irsi
SFX M si mene irsi
SFX M i elo irsi
SFX M i ela irsi
SFX M i eli irsi
SFX M i ele irsi
SFX M i ene irsi
SFX M si celo irsi
SFX M si cela irsi
SFX M si celi irsi
SFX M si cele irsi
SFX M si cene irsi
SFX M si velo irsi
SFX M si vela irsi
SFX M si veli irsi
SFX M si vele irsi
SFX M si vene irsi
SFX M si glielo irsi
SFX M si gliela irsi
SFX M si glieli irsi
SFX M si gliele irsi
SFX M si gliene irsi
SFX M rsi mi irsi
SFX M rsi ti irsi
SFX M rsi ci irsi
SFX M rsi le irsi
SFX M rsi lo irsi
SFX M rsi li irsi
SFX M rsi gli irsi
SFX M rsi ne irsi
SFX M rsi la irsi
SFX M rsi melo irsi
SFX M rsi mela irsi
SFX M rsi meli irsi
SFX M rsi mele irsi
SFX M rsi telo irsi
SFX M rsi tela irsi
SFX M rsi teli irsi
SFX M rsi tele irsi
SFX M rsi tene irsi
SFX M rsi mene irsi
SFX M rsi celo irsi
SFX M rsi cela irsi
SFX M rsi celi irsi
SFX M rsi cele irsi
SFX M rsi cene irsi
SFX M rsi glielo irsi
SFX M rsi gliela irsi
SFX M rsi glieli irsi
SFX M rsi gliele irsi
SFX M rsi gliene irsi

SFX P Y 165 #verbi che si coniugano come fare
SFX P e 0 are
SFX P re 0 are
SFX P re ccia are
SFX P re cciamo are
SFX P re cciano are
SFX P re cciate are
SFX P re ccio are
SFX P re cemmo are
SFX P re cendo are
SFX P re cente are
SFX P re centi are
SFX P re centisi are
SFX P re cesse are
SFX P re cessero are
SFX P re cessi are
SFX P re cessimo are
SFX P re ceste are
SFX P re cesti are
SFX P re ceva are
SFX P re cevamo are
SFX P re cevano are
SFX P re cevasi are
SFX P re cevate are
SFX P re cevi are
SFX P re cevo are
SFX P re i are
SFX P re nno are
SFX P e à are
SFX P e ai are
SFX P e anno are
SFX P 0 bbe are
SFX P 0 bbero are
SFX P 0 i are
SFX P 0 mmo are
SFX P 0 mo are
SFX P 0 ste are
SFX P 0 sti are
SFX P 0 te are
SFX P e ò are
SFX P re te are
SFX P re tto are
SFX P are ece are
SFX P are ecero are
SFX P are eci are
SFX P re cciamoci are
SFX P re cciamola are
SFX P re cciamolo are
SFX P re cciamole are
SFX P re cciamoli are
SFX P re cciamogli are
SFX P re cciamone are
SFX P re cciamocela are
SFX P re cciamocelo are
SFX P re cciamocele are
SFX P re cciamoceli are
SFX P re cciamocene are
SFX P re cciamogliela are
SFX P re cciamoglielo are
SFX P re cciamogliele are
SFX P re cciamoglieli are
SFX P re cciamogliene are
SFX P re tevelo are
SFX P re teveli are
SFX P re tevela are
SFX P re tevele are
SFX P re tevene are
SFX P re teglielo are
SFX P re teglieli are
SFX P re tegliela are
SFX P re tegliele are
SFX P re tegliene are
SFX P re tecelo are
SFX P re teceli are
SFX P re tecela are
SFX P re tecele are
SFX P re tecene are
SFX P e si are
SFX P e mi are
SFX P e ti are
SFX P e ci are
SFX P e le are
SFX P e lo are
SFX P e li are
SFX P e vi are
SFX P e gli are
SFX P e ne are
SFX P e la are
SFX P e telo are
SFX P e tela are
SFX P e teli are
SFX P e tele are
SFX P e tene are
SFX P e melo are
SFX P e mela are
SFX P e meli are
SFX P e mele are
SFX P e mene are
SFX P e selo are
SFX P e sela are
SFX P e seli are
SFX P e sele are
SFX P e sene are
SFX P e celo are
SFX P e cela are
SFX P e celi are
SFX P e cele are
SFX P e cene are
SFX P e velo are
SFX P e vela are
SFX P e veli are
SFX P e vele are
SFX P e vene are
SFX P e glielo are
SFX P e gliela are
SFX P e glieli are
SFX P e gliele are
SFX P e gliene are
SFX P re mmi are
SFX P re tti are
SFX P re cci are
SFX P re lle are
SFX P re llo are
SFX P re lli are
SFX P re gli are
SFX P re nne are
SFX P re lla are
SFX P re mmelo are
SFX P re mmela are
SFX P re mmeli are
SFX P re mmele are
SFX P re mmene are
SFX P re ccelo are
SFX P re ccela are
SFX P re cceli are
SFX P re ccele are
SFX P re ccene are
SFX P re glielo are
SFX P re gliela are
SFX P re glieli are
SFX P re gliele are
SFX P re gliene are
SFX P e mici are
SFX P e tici are
SFX P e misi are
SFX P e tisi are
SFX P e visi are
SFX P e cisi are
SFX P e glisi are
SFX P e lesi are
SFX P e vici are
SFX P re teci are
SFX P re tela are
SFX P re tele are
SFX P re teli are
SFX P re telo are
SFX P re tene are
SFX P re temela are
SFX P re temele are
SFX P re temelo are
SFX P re temeli are
SFX P re temene are
SFX P re temi are
SFX P re tegli are
SFX P re tevi are
SFX P re teti are

SFX O N 3
SFX O o i [^igc]o
SFX O o hi [gc]o
SFX O o 0 io

SFX Q N 2
SFX Q a e [^gc]a
SFX Q a he [gc]a

SFX R N 1
SFX R a i a

SFX S N 1
SFX S e i e
