dicts/it_IT/it_IT.dic
acuirsi/MTqr
acuito/HTUqrs
aeroscalo/OTqr
aferetica/QRTUqrs
affaristica/QRTUqrs
affettazione/STUqrs
affiochito/HTUqrs
affliggersi/LT
aggredirsi/M
alleggerito/HTUqrs
allocromatica/QRTUqrs
altea/QTUqrs
alveo/OTqr
ammattito/HTUqrs
ammoscirsi/MTqr
amputabile/STUqrs
anatema/RTqr
andarsi/I
animosa/QTUqrs
annuito/HTUqrs
antibolscevica/QRTUqrs
antipertensivo/OTqr
antistorica/QRTUqrs
apolitica/QRTUqrs
apparsi/JIT
aprirsi/MTqr
arabista/QRTUqrs
areale/STUqrs
arguito/HTUqrs
ariosteo/OTqr
arpetta/QTUqrs
artefare/PT
ascensorista/QRTUqrs
aspergersi/LT
assaporito/HTUqrs
assordirsi/MTqr
assuefare/PTX
astrarsi/IT
astronautica/QRTUqrs
astrusissima/QTU
attecchito/HTUqrs
attero/OTqr
attrarsi/I
attuatore/STqr
autocommiserarsi/I
autocritica/QRTUqrs
autoescludersi/LTqr
avanscena/QTUqrs
avvilirsi/MTqr
avvilito/HTUqrs
baccelletto/O
bancarellista/QR
barattabile/S
bastardiera/Q
biennio/O
bisettore/S
bizantinista/QR
blandito/H
bolzonaglia/Q
bucentoro/O
cadersi/L
callista/QR
caloria/Q
candeliere/S
casermaggio/O
catechista/QR
cavallona/QR
cessazione/S
circoscriversi/L
clarinista/QR
climaterio/O
collenchima/R
colonizzazione/S
colpirsi/M
colpito/H
comparsi/JI
compiersi/L
confare/P
congiungersi/L
coniazione/S
contraffare/P
contrarsi/I
contribuirsi/M
contribuito/H
contundersi/L
copertura/Q
corpetto/O
cosonantizzazione/S
costituenda/QR
costringersi/L
darsi/I
deboluccia/nQ
deferirsi/M
degente/S
deludersi/L
dicastero/O
diffondersi/L
dimenticabile/S
dinasta/QR
disassuefare/P
disciogliersi/L
disfare/P
disobbedito/H
dissentirsi/M
dissolversi/L
distrarsi/I
dolersi/L
domatrice/S
dracena/Q
edema/RTqr
elettivo/OTYq
emettersi/LJ
emiparassita/QRTUqrs
emolitica/QRTUqrs
epidurale/STUqrs
epigramma/RTqr
erudirsi/M
escussa/QTUqrs
esistito/HTUqrs
esortativo/OTqr
espellersi/L
espressionista/QRTUqrs
estrarsi/IT
estrinsecazione/STUqrs
fanghiglia/Q
fare/PJd
fendersi/L
fiesolano/O
fischione/S
forfecchia/Q
fornirsi/M
fotogrammetrista/QR
fustellatrice/S
gavettino/O
genuflettersi/L
geofagia/Q
gioito/H
grassante/S
guarnirsi/M
guattero/O
guttaperca/Q
icastica/QRTUqrs
imbroncirsi/MTqr
immusonito/HTUqrs
immutata/QTU
impadronirsi/MTqr
impermutabile/STUqrs
impietosirsi/MTqr
impressionismo/OTqr
imprimersi/LTqr
inacidirsi/MTqr
incancrenirsi/MTqr
incancrenito/HTUqrs
incimurrito/HTUqrs
incitrullirsi/MTqr
inconoscibile/STUqrs
indegnissima/QTU
indolenzirsi/MTqr
infellonito/HTUqrs
infinitesimo/OTq
inflaccidirsi/M
infortunistica/QRTUqrs
ingabbiatrice/STUqrs
inghiottirsi/M
innervosirsi/MTqr
inscriversi/LTqr
insicurissima/QTU
insignorirsi/MTqr
insistito/HTUqrs
intormentimento/OTqr
intorpidirsi/MTqr
intromettersi/LTqr
inveito/HTUqrs
inviperirsi/MTq
ipermetropia/QTUqrs
ippica/QRTUqrs
irlandese/STUqrs
istruttiva/QTUqrs
iterativo/OTYq
languito/H
linguista/QR
liquefare/P
macaco/O
magnetizzazione/S
marmaglia/Q
messidoro/O
microbicida/R
mietersi/L
monorifrangente/S
multipolo/O
neorealista/QR
neuroma/R
obbedito/H
offuscamento/OTqr
omoplata/RTq
opponente/STUqrs
opprimersi/LTqr
organometallica/QRTUqrs
oro/OTq
ostrogotica/QRTUqrs
panteismo/O
pelletta/Q
percepirsi/M
perlustratore/S
persuadersi/L
pesticida/R
pettinatoio/O
pneumatologico/P
porro/O
preavvertito/H
precludersi/L
pregiabile/S
prevalersi/L
protendersi/L
protocollista/QR
protrarsi/I
psicologista/QR
putrefare/P
quadriciclo/O
raddolcirsi/M
radiciforme/S
raggrinzito/H
rarefare/P
ravvedersi/L
reimmergersi/L
riammettersi/L
ribadino/O
ribollirsi/M
ricuperabile/S
ridefinito/H
riesprimersi/L
rimpettito/H
rincoglionirsi/M
ripartito/H
rischiarirsi/M
risedersi/L
ritrarsi/I
riuscito/H
roncatura/Q
saccopelista/R
saltrato/O
sapore/S
sbiadirsi/M
scaturito/H
sciogliersi/L
sdrucirsi/M
semiesonero/O
setticida/R
settimana/Q
sfare/P
sfuggito/H
silloge/S
snellirsi/M
soddisfare/P
sommergersi/L
sonaglino/O
sopraffare/P
sottrarsi/I
sovvertito/H
sperdersi/L
squittito/H
sradicatore/S
stampatora/QR
starsi/I
stellionato/O
stiepidirsi/M
stizzito/H
stola/Q
stupefare/P
subito/HY
sveltito/H
svigorirsi/M
teatro/O
temersi/L
tenerume/S
termogramma/R
tormalina/Q
torrefare/P
trarsi/I
tumefare/P
turbonave/S
ubbidito/HTUqrs
umorista/QRTUqrs
unghiolo/OTqr
vedersi/L
verniciatura/Q
viso/O
vomere/S
zittirsi/M
